Hawaii statutes.
§328C-2 Exceptions to liability. (a)
A charitable, religious, or nonprofit organization which in good faith receives
pharmaceuticals or health care supplies, apparently fit for human consumption
or external use, and distributes them to needy persons at no charge, shall not
be liable for any civil damages or criminal penalties resulting from the use of
the pharmaceuticals or health care supplies donated to needy persons unless an
injury or illness results to those needy persons as a result of that organization's
gross negligence or wanton acts or omissions.

(b) Any pharmacy, wholesale prescription drug
distributor, pharmaceutical company, institutional facility, or practitioner
that in good faith provides pharmaceuticals, including previously dispensed prescription
drugs, and health care supplies to needy persons without remuneration or
expectation of remuneration, shall be exempt from civil liability for injuries
and damages resulting from their acts or omissions in providing pharmaceuticals
and health care supplies, except for gross negligence, or wanton acts or
omissions on the part of the pharmacy, wholesale prescription drug distributor,
pharmaceutical company, institutional facility, or practitioner.

(c) Any donated, previously dispensed,
prescription drug:

(1) Shall be in its dispensed, unopened,
tamper-evident single user unit;

(2) Shall have remained at all times in the control
of a person trained and knowledgeable in the storage and administration of
drugs in institutional facilities;

(3) Shall not have been adulterated, misbranded, or
stored under conditions contrary to standards established by the United States
Pharmacopoeia or the product manufacturer; and

(4) Shall be used before the expiration date on the
unit.

(d) This section shall not relieve any
organization from any other duty imposed upon it by law for the inspection of
donated pharmaceuticals or health care supplies or for any provisions regarding
the handling of those products, or relieve any health care provider from
liability arising out of the prescription of such pharmaceuticals or health
care supplies.

(e) For purposes of this section:

"Needy person" means any natural
person who lacks the means to obtain adequate or proper pharmaceuticals or
health care supplies as determined by a practitioner at a Hawaii qualified
health center established under section 346-41.5, to be in need of service.

"Pharmaceutical company" means any
company that manufactures pharmaceuticals and health care supplies.

"Pharmaceuticals and health care
supplies" means any medicine (prescription or nonprescription, excluding
all controlled substances listed in chapter 329) or health care supplies such
as soap, personal sanitary products, baby formula, dietary supplement, health
care aids such as thermometers, surgical gloves, or bandages, or any other item
that is customarily fit for human consumption or external use, before the
expiration date stamped on the product, if any.

"Pharmacy" is as defined in chapter
461. [L 1997, c 337, pt of §2; am L 2001, c 207, §2; am L 2004, c 190, §§7, 11]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next